District of Columbia statutes.
29-1205.04

Protection of person dealing with trustee.

(a)

A person that in good faith assists a trustee, or in good faith and for value deals with a trustee, without knowledge that the trustee is exceeding or improperly exercising the trustee’s power, shall be protected from liability as if the trustee properly exercised the power.

(b)

A person that in good faith deals with a trustee need not inquire into the extent of a trustee’s power or the propriety of the exercise of the power.

(c)

A person that in good faith delivers property to a trustee need not ensure its proper use.

(d)

A person that in good faith and without knowledge that the trusteeship has terminated assists a former trustee as if the former trustee were still a trustee, or in good faith and for value deals with a former trustee as if the former trustee were still a trustee shall be protected from liability as if the former trustee were still a trustee.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 504 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.